Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 3

Engine Mufflers

69-9-301. Mufflers required.

The exhaust of every internal combustion engine used on any vessel shall be effectively muffled by a muffling device or system to muffle the noise of the exhaust.

Acts 1977, ch. 77, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2241; T.C.A. §69-10-301.

69-9-302. Noise level restrictions — Testing for noise levels.

No person shall operate any vessel in or upon the waters of Tennessee in such a manner as to exceed 86 bdA measured at a distance of fifty feet (50') from the vessel.

Testing procedures employed to determine such noise levels shall be in accordance with the exterior sound level measurement procedure for pleasure motorboats recommended by the society of automotive engineers in its recommended practice designated SAEJ34. The agency may, by regulation, amend such testing procedures when deemed necessary to adjust to advances in technology.

Acts 1977, ch. 132, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2242; T.C.A. §69-10-302.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of TWRA Officers to Enforce Local Noise Ordinances on Waters by Agreement with Local Law Enforcement Agency. OAG 15-68, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (9/23/15).

69-9-303. Certification by manufacturers — Testing procedures.

Vessel motors manufactured after January 1, 1977, and offered for sale in Tennessee shall be certified to the agency by the motor manufacturer as having been tested and found not to exceed the noise levels prescribed in § 69-9-302.

Testing procedures employed to determine such noise levels shall be in accordance with § 69-9-302. The agency may, by regulation, amend such testing procedures when deemed necessary to adjust to advances in technology.

Acts 1977, ch. 132, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2243; T.C.A. §69-10-303; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 15.

69-9-304. Alterations to engines — Cutouts.

No person shall remove or alter any part of an engine, its propulsion unit, or its enclosure, or modify the mounting of an engine in or upon a vessel in such a manner as to exceed the noise levels prescribed in § 69-9-302.

The use of cutouts is prohibited.

Acts 1977, ch. 77, § 1; 1977, ch. 132, § 3; T.C.A., § 70-2244; T.C.A. §69-10-304.

69-9-305. Regattas and boat races excepted.

This part shall not apply to vessels competing in a regatta or boat race approved as provided in §69-9-211, and for such vessels while on trial runs, during a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours immediately preceding such regatta or race and for such vessels while competing in official trials for speed records during a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours immediately following such race or regatta.

Acts 1977, ch. 77, § 1; 1977, ch. 132, § 4; T.C.A., § 70-2245; T.C.A. §69-10-305.

69-9-306. Violations — Penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1977, ch. 77, § 2; 1977, ch. 132, § 5; T.C.A., § 70-2246; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A. §69-10-306.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.